Illinois, session 104th, HB4847.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1038 and 6z-149 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The University of Illinois Cancer Center 8Fund. 9    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)10    Sec. 6z-149. The University of Illinois Cancer Center 11Fund; creation. The University of Illinois Cancer Center Fund 12is hereby created as a special fund in the State treasury. 13Moneys in the Fund shall be used by the University of Illinois 14Cancer Center for purposes of cancer research, patient care, 15and operating expenses of the Cancer Center. 16    Section 10. The Cigarette Tax Act is amended by changing 17Section 2 as follows: 18    (35 ILCS 130/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 453.2)19    Sec. 2. Tax imposed; rate; collection, payment, and 20distribution; discount.  HB4847- 2 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1    (a) Beginning on July 1, 2019, in place of the aggregate 2tax rate of 99 mills previously imposed by this Act, a tax is 3imposed upon any person engaged in business as a retailer of 4cigarettes at the rate of 149 mills per cigarette sold or 5otherwise disposed of in the course of such business in this 6State.7    (b) The payment of such taxes shall be evidenced by a stamp 8affixed to each original package of cigarettes, or an 9authorized substitute for such stamp imprinted on each 10original package of such cigarettes underneath the sealed 11transparent outside wrapper of such original package, as 12hereinafter provided. However, such taxes are not imposed upon 13any activity in such business in interstate commerce or 14otherwise, which activity may not under the Constitution and 15statutes of the United States be made the subject of taxation 16by this State.17    Out of the 149 mills per cigarette tax imposed by 18subsection (a), until July 1, 2023, the revenues received from 194 mills shall be paid into the Common School Fund each month, 20not to exceed $9,000,000 per month. Out of the 149 mills per 21cigarette tax imposed by subsection (a), until July 1, 2023, 22all of the revenues received from 7 mills shall be paid into 23the Common School Fund each month. Out of the 149 mills per 24cigarette tax imposed by subsection (a), until July 1, 2023, 2550 mills per cigarette each month shall be paid into the 26Healthcare Provider Relief Fund.   HB4847- 3 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1    Beginning on July 1, 2006 and until July 1, 2023, all of 2the moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to 3this Act and the Cigarette Use Tax Act, other than the moneys 4that are dedicated to the Common School Fund and, beginning on 5June 14, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-688), other 6than the moneys from the additional taxes imposed by Public 7Act 97-688 that must be paid each month into the Healthcare 8Provider Relief Fund and other than the moneys from the 9additional taxes imposed by Public Act 101-31 that must be 10paid each month under subsection (c), shall be distributed 11each month as follows: first, there shall be paid into the 12General Revenue Fund an amount that, when added to the amount 13paid into the Common School Fund for that month, equals 14$29,200,000; then, from the moneys remaining, if any amounts 15required to be paid into the General Revenue Fund in previous 16months remain unpaid, those amounts shall be paid into the 17General Revenue Fund; then from the moneys remaining, 18$5,000,000 per month shall be paid into the School 19Infrastructure Fund; then, if any amounts required to be paid 20into the School Infrastructure Fund in previous months remain 21unpaid, those amounts shall be paid into the School 22Infrastructure Fund; then the moneys remaining, if any, shall 23be paid into the Long-Term Care Provider Fund. Any amounts 24required to be paid into the General Revenue Fund, the School 25Infrastructure Fund, the Long-Term Care Provider Fund, the 26Common School Fund, the Capital Projects Fund, or the   HB4847- 4 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1Healthcare Provider Relief Fund under this subsection that 2remain unpaid as of July 1, 2023 shall be deemed satisfied on 3that date, eliminating any deficiency accrued through that 4date. 5    (c) Beginning on July 1, 2019 and until July 1, 2023, all 6of the moneys from the additional taxes imposed by Public Act 7101-31, except for moneys received from the tax on electronic 8cigarettes, received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to 9this Act, the Cigarette Use Tax Act, and the Tobacco Products 10Tax Act of 1995 shall be distributed each month into the 11Capital Projects Fund. 12    (c-5) Beginning on July 1, 2023 and until July 1, 2026, all 13of the moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant 14to (i) this Act, (ii) the Cigarette Use Tax Act, and (iii) the 15tax imposed on little cigars under Section 10-10 of the 16Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995 shall be paid each month as 17follows: 18        (1) 7% into the Common School Fund; 19        (2) 34% into the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund; 20        (3) 34% into the Capital Projects Fund; and 21        (4) 25% into the General Revenue Fund. 22    Beginning on July 1, 2026, all of the moneys received by 23the Department of Revenue pursuant to (i) this Act, (ii) the 24Cigarette Use Tax Act, and (iii) the tax imposed on little 25cigars under Section 10-10 of the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 261995 shall be paid each month as follows:   HB4847- 5 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1        (1) 2% into the University of Illinois Cancer Center 2    Fund; 3        (2) 7% into the Common School Fund; 4        (3) 34% into the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund; 5        (4) 34% into the Capital Projects Fund; and 6        (5) 23% into the General Revenue Fund. 7    (d) Until July 1, 2023, except for moneys received from 8the additional taxes imposed by Public Act 101-31, moneys 9collected from the tax imposed on little cigars under Section 1010-10 of the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995 shall be included 11with the moneys collected under the Cigarette Tax Act and the 12Cigarette Use Tax Act when making distributions to the Common 13School Fund, the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund, the General 14Revenue Fund, the School Infrastructure Fund, and the 15Long-Term Care Provider Fund under this Section. Any amounts, 16including moneys collected from the tax imposed on little 17cigars under Section 10-10 of the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 181995, that are required to be paid into the General Revenue 19Fund, the School Infrastructure Fund, the Long-Term Care 20Provider Fund, the Common School Fund, the Capital Projects 21Fund, or the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund under subsection 22(b) that remain unpaid as of July 1, 2023 shall be deemed 23satisfied on that date, eliminating any deficiency accrued 24through that date. Beginning on July 1, 2023, moneys collected 25from the tax imposed on little cigars under Section 10-10 of 26the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995 shall be included with the   HB4847- 6 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1moneys collected under the Cigarette Tax Act and the Cigarette 2Use Tax Act when making distributions under subsection (c-5).3    (e) If the tax imposed herein terminates or has 4terminated, distributors who have bought stamps while such tax 5was in effect and who therefore paid such tax, but who can 6show, to the Department's satisfaction, that they sold the 7cigarettes to which they affixed such stamps after such tax 8had terminated and did not recover the tax or its equivalent 9from purchasers, shall be allowed by the Department to take 10credit for such absorbed tax against subsequent tax stamp 11purchases from the Department by such distributor.12    (f) The impact of the tax levied by this Act is imposed 13upon the retailer and shall be prepaid or pre-collected by the 14distributor for the purpose of convenience and facility only, 15and the amount of the tax shall be added to the price of the 16cigarettes sold by such distributor. Collection of the tax 17shall be evidenced by a stamp or stamps affixed to each 18original package of cigarettes, as hereinafter provided. Any 19distributor who purchases stamps may credit any excess 20payments verified by the Department against amounts 21subsequently due for the purchase of additional stamps, until 22such time as no excess payment remains. 23    (g) Each distributor shall collect the tax from the 24retailer at or before the time of the sale, shall affix the 25stamps as hereinafter required, and shall remit the tax 26collected from retailers to the Department, as hereinafter   HB4847- 7 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1provided. Any distributor who fails to properly collect and 2pay the tax imposed by this Act shall be liable for the tax.3    (h) Any distributor having cigarettes in his or her 4possession on July 1, 2019 to which tax stamps have been 5affixed, and any distributor having stamps in his or her 6possession on July 1, 2019 that have not been affixed to 7packages of cigarettes before July 1, 2019, is required to pay 8the additional tax that begins on July 1, 2019 imposed by 9Public Act 101-31 to the extent that the volume of affixed and 10unaffixed stamps in the distributor's possession on July 1, 112019 exceeds the average monthly volume of cigarette stamps 12purchased by the distributor in calendar year 2018. This 13payment, less the discount provided in subsection (l), is due 14when the distributor first makes a purchase of cigarette 15stamps on or after July 1, 2019 or on the first due date of a 16return under this Act occurring on or after July 1, 2019, 17whichever occurs first. Those distributors may elect to pay 18the additional tax on packages of cigarettes to which stamps 19have been affixed and on any stamps in the distributor's 20possession that have not been affixed to packages of 21cigarettes in their possession on July 1, 2019 over a period 22not to exceed 12 months from the due date of the additional tax 23by notifying the Department in writing. The first payment for 24distributors making such election is due when the distributor 25first makes a purchase of cigarette tax stamps on or after July 261, 2019 or on the first due date of a return under this Act   HB4847- 8 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1occurring on or after July 1, 2019, whichever occurs first. 2Distributors making such an election are not entitled to take 3the discount provided in subsection (l) on such payments. 4    (i) Any retailer having cigarettes in its possession on 5July 1, 2019 to which tax stamps have been affixed is not 6required to pay the additional tax that begins on July 1, 2019 7imposed by Public Act 101-31 on those stamped cigarettes. 8    (j) Distributors making sales of cigarettes to secondary 9distributors shall add the amount of the tax to the price of 10the cigarettes sold by the distributors. Secondary 11distributors making sales of cigarettes to retailers shall 12include the amount of the tax in the price of the cigarettes 13sold to retailers. The amount of tax shall not be less than the 14amount of taxes imposed by the State and all local 15jurisdictions. The amount of local taxes shall be calculated 16based on the location of the retailer's place of business 17shown on the retailer's certificate of registration or 18sub-registration issued to the retailer pursuant to Section 2a 19of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. The original packages of 20cigarettes sold to the retailer shall bear all the required 21stamps, or other indicia, for the taxes included in the price 22of cigarettes. 23    (k) The amount of the Cigarette Tax imposed by this Act 24shall be separately stated, apart from the price of the goods, 25by distributors, manufacturer representatives, secondary 26distributors, and retailers, in all bills and sales invoices.  HB4847- 9 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1    (l) The distributor shall be required to collect the tax 2provided under subsection (a) and, to cover the costs of such 3collection, shall be allowed a discount during any year 4commencing July 1st and ending the following June 30th in 5accordance with the schedule set out hereinbelow, which 6discount shall be allowed at the time of purchase of the stamps 7when purchase is required by this Act, or at the time when the 8tax is remitted to the Department without the purchase of 9stamps from the Department when that method of paying the tax 10is required or authorized by this Act.11    On and after December 1, 1985, a discount equal to 1.75% of 12the amount of the tax payable under this Act up to and 13including the first $3,000,000 paid hereunder by such 14distributor to the Department during any such year and 1.5% of 15the amount of any additional tax paid hereunder by such 16distributor to the Department during any such year shall 17apply.18    Two or more distributors that use a common means of 19affixing revenue tax stamps or that are owned or controlled by 20the same interests shall be treated as a single distributor 21for the purpose of computing the discount.22    (m) The taxes herein imposed are in addition to all other 23occupation or privilege taxes imposed by the State of 24Illinois, or by any political subdivision thereof, or by any 25municipal corporation.26(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB4847- 10 -LRB104 20054 HLH 33505 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.